Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2606
Stamps; affix; cancellation.

Before being delivered to the consumer, each package of cigarettes shall have securely affixed thereto a suitable stamp or cigarette tax meter impression denoting the tax thereon. Any stamp so affixed shall be properly canceled prior to removal or consumption under such regulations as the Tax Commissioner shall prescribe.

Laws 1947, c. 267, § 6, p. 863.